Massachusetts, session 194th, H2222.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting in chapter 19 the following section:-
Section 27. Commission on Telehealth.
SECTION 1. As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Commission” the commission on telehealth established pursuant to section 2.
“Telehealth” telehealth services as defined in section 50 of chapter 112.
“Commissioner,” the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, as defined in
section 1 of Chapter 19.
SECTION 2. A special commission is hereby established for the purposes of making an
investigation relative to the quality and accessibility of telehealth for residents of the
of 3

Commonwealth and to develop recommendations for fostering the appropriate expansion of
telehealth services.
SECTION 3. The commission shall:
(i) assess, comment on, and make recommendations with respect to, the content, design,
management and likely effectiveness of specific policies, programs and initiatives proposed or
undertaken to expand access to telehealth services in the Commonwealth, including but not
limited to the expansion of telehealth services and certifications from outside of the
Commonwealth;
(ii) assess, comment on, and make recommendations with respect to, the content, design,
management and likely effectiveness of specific policies, programs and initiatives proposed or
undertaken to ensure the safety and quality of telehealth services offered by providers operating
within the Commonwealth, including but not limited to the qualifications of doctors,
psychiatrists, therapists, and other employees, as well as the ways in which telehealth is
marketed and advertised to residents of the Commonwealth;
SECTION 4. The commission shall consist of 10 members: 2 members appointed by the
governor who shall have expertise in mental health or telehealth services; 2 members of the
senate, 1 of whom shall be the president of the senate or a designee who shall serve as co-chair,
and appoint the 1 additional member of the senate; 2 members of the house, one of whom shall
be the speaker or a designee who shall serve as co-chair, and appoint the one additional member
of the house; and 4 members appointed by the commissioner, 2 of whom shall have expertise in
mental health or telehealth services, and 2 of whom shall represent a non-profit organization
specializing in mental health or telehealth services.
of 3

SECTION 5. The commission shall conduct public hearings to gather information and
submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the General Court, together with drafts of
legislation necessary to carry out those recommendations, not later than December 31, 2026.
of 3